apertium-id-ms.ms.xfst
! apertium-id-ms.ms.xfst

define AssimDelRules [ "{N}" -> m || _ [ p | b | f ] ,,
[ p | f ] -> 0 || "{N}" _ ]
.o.
[ "{N}" -> n || _ [ t | d | c | j | s y | z ] ,,
t -> 0 || "{N}" _ ]
.o.
[ "{N}" -> n y || _ s ,, s -> 0 || "{N}" _ ]
.o.
[ "{N}" -> n g || _ [ a | e | i | o | u | k | g | h ] ,,
k -> 0 || "{N}" _ ]
.o.
"{N}" -> 0 || _ [ m | n | l | r | w | y ] ;
